Vermont, session 2025-2026, H780.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. chapter 57, subchapter 4 is amended to read:
Subchapter 4. Shoplifting
VT LEG #386230 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.780
2026 Page 2 of 5
* * *
§ 2575. OFFENSE OF RETAIL THEFT
A person commits the offense of retail theft when the person, with intent of
depriving a merchant wrongfully of the lawful possession of merchandise,
money, or credit:
(1) takes and carries away or causes to be taken and carried away or aids
and abets the carrying away of any merchandise from a retail mercantile
establishment without paying the retail value of the merchandise; or
* * *
§ 2577. PENALTY
(a) A person convicted of the offense of retail theft of merchandise having
a retail value not in excess of $250.00 shall be punished by a fine of not more
than $500.00 or imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or both.
(b) A person convicted of the offense of retail theft of merchandise having
a retail value in excess of $250.00 and not in excess of $900.00 shall:
(1) for a first offense, be punished by a fine of not more than $500.00 or
imprisonment for not more than six months, or both;
(2) for a second offense, be punished by a fine of not more than
$1,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than two years, if the second offense
occurs not more than two years after the first offense;
VT LEG #386230 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.780
2026 Page 3 of 5
(3) for a third offense, be punished by a fine of not more than $1,500.00
or imprisonment for not more than three years, or both, if the third offense
occurs not more than two years after the second offense, provided that at least
60 consecutive days of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and may
not be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised sentence; or
(4) for a fourth or subsequent offense, be punished by a fine of not more
than $2,500.00 or imprisonment for not more than 10 years, or both, if the
fourth or subsequent offense occurs not more than two years after the
immediately preceding offense, provided that at least six consecutive months
of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and may not be suspended or
deferred or served as a supervised sentence.
(c)(1) A person convicted of the offense of retail theft of merchandise
having a retail value in excess of $900.00 shall be punished by a fine of not
more than $1,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than 10 years, or both.
(2) A person who is convicted of a third offense of retail theft of
merchandise having a retail value in excess of $900.00 shall be punished
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, provided that at least six
consecutive months of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and may
not be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised sentence.
(3) A person who is convicted of a fourth or subsequent offense of retail
theft of merchandise having a retail value in excess of $900.00 shall be
VT LEG #386230 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.780
2026 Page 4 of 5
punished pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, provided that at least
12 consecutive months of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and
may not be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised sentence.
* * *
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 4238 is amended to read:
§ 4238. SECOND AND SUBSEQUENT OFFENSES; MANDATORY
MINIMUMS FOR TRAFFICKING OFFENSES
(a) A person convicted of a second or subsequent offense of violating
section 4228, 4230, 4231, 4232, 4233, 4234, 4235, 4236, or 4237 of this title,
except a violation of subdivision 4230(a)(1), shall be subject to a term of
imprisonment or fined up to twice that authorized by those sections, or both.
(b) A person convicted of trafficking cannabis in violation of subsection
4230(c) of this title, trafficking cocaine in violation of subsection 4231(c) of
this title, trafficking heroin in violation of subsection 4233(c) of this title,
trafficking fentanyl in violation of subsection 4233a(b) of this title, or
trafficking methamphetamine in violation of subsection 4234a(c) of this title
shall be subject to the following mandatory minimum sentences:
(1) At least 12 consecutive months of the sentence of imprisonment
shall be served and may not be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised
sentence.
VT LEG #386230 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.780
2026 Page 5 of 5
(2) At least 24 consecutive months of the sentence of imprisonment
shall be served and may not be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised
sentence if the violation causes death or serious bodily injury to any person.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386230 v.1